Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-708.01
Special assessments; illegal annexation; validation.

Whenever a city of the first class lawfully reannexes territory which it had formerly annexed but which annexation was illegal because the statutes under which such original annexation was made were unconstitutional and void, (1) all special assessments levied by such city of the first class with respect to such territory shall be validated, binding and legal upon such city of the first class and the inhabitants of such territory in the same manner as if the original annexation had been lawful, (2) all zoning, special use permits and contracts for municipal services made or entered into with respect to such territory by such city of the first class shall be validated, binding and legal upon such city of the first class and the inhabitants of such territory in the same manner as if the original annexation had been lawful, (3) any prior actions by any officials of such city of the first class, including the election of council members from such territory or a part thereof shall be validated, binding and legal upon such city of the first class and the inhabitants of such territory in the same manner as if the original annexation had been lawful, and (4) such city of the first class shall have power to assess or reassess and levy or relevy new assessments equal to the special benefits and not exceeding the cost of improvements for which any assessment was originally made upon such territory to be made in substantially the manner provided for making original assessments of like nature and when so made, shall constitute a lien upon the property prior and superior to all other liens except liens for other special assessments, and taxes or special assessments so assessed or reassessed shall be enforced and collected as other special taxes, and in making such assessment or reassessment, the city council sitting as a board of equalization and assessment shall take into consideration payments, if any, made on behalf of the property reassessed under assessments made prior to the reannexation.

Laws 1967, c. 62, § 1, p. 210.